Washington statutes.
RCW 35.31.050

Accident fund—Warrants for judgments.

Every city of the second class and town may create an accident fund upon which the clerk shall draw warrants for the full amount of any judgment including interest and costs against the city or town on account of personal injuries suffered by any person as shown by a transcript of the judgment duly certified to the clerk. The warrants shall be issued in denominations not less than one hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars; they shall draw interest at the rate of six percent per annum, shall be numbered consecutively and be paid in the order of their issue.

[ 1994 c 81 s 55; 1965 c 7 s 35.31.050. Prior: (i) 1909 c 128 s 1; RRS s 9482. (ii) 1909 c 128 s 2; RRS s 9483. (iii) 1909 c 128 s 5; RRS s 9486.]